Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-104
Offense; crime; synonymous.

The terms offense and crime are synonymous as used in this code and mean a violation of, or conduct defined by, any statute for which a fine, imprisonment, or death may be imposed.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 5;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The changes made to section 28-104 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 5, have been omitted because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.